Washington statutes.
RCW 11.42.150

Appointment of personal representative—Cessation of notice agent powers and authority—Notice not affected—Personal representative's powers—Petition for reimbursement for allowance and payment of claims by notice agent.

(1) The powers and authority of a notice agent immediately cease, and the office of notice agent becomes vacant, upon appointment of a personal representative for the estate of the decedent. Except as provided in RCW 11.42.140(2), the cessation of the powers and authority does not affect the filing and publication of notice to creditors and does not affect actual notice to creditors given by the notice agent.

(2) As set forth in RCW 11.40.160, a personal representative may adopt, ratify, nullify, or reject any actions of the notice agent.

(3) If a personal representative is appointed and the personal representative does not nullify the allowance of a claim that the notice agent allowed and paid, the person or persons whose assets were used to pay the claim may petition for reimbursement from the estate to the extent the payment was not in accordance with chapter 11.10 RCW.

[ 1997 c 252 s 40; 1994 c 221 s 44.]

NOTES:

Application—1997 c 252 ss 1-73: See note following RCW 11.02.005.

Effective dates—1994 c 221: See note following RCW 11.100.035.